California, session 20252026, AB77.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19817 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19817. The commission shall establish and appoint a Gaming Policy Advisory Committee of 10 12 members. The committee shall be composed of five representatives of controlled gambling licensees and licensees, five members of the general public in equal numbers. public, one representative of academia who possesses knowledge on matters related to gaming, and one representative from the Bureau of Gambling Control. The executive director shall, from time to time, convene the committee shall convene the committee at least twice every calendar year for the purpose of discussing matters of controlled gambling regulatory policy and any other relevant gambling-related issue. The committee’s objective shall be to solicit input from various constituencies, including the public, on gaming policy issues for future consideration to the commission, as appropriate. The recommendations concerning gambling policy made by the committee shall be presented to the commission, but shall be deemed advisory and not binding on the commission in the performance of its duties or functions. The committee may shall not advise the commission on Indian gaming.